District of Columbia statutes.
38-2023.11

Recomputation of benefits.

The annuities of all teachers retired prior to the effective date of this act shall be recomputed in accordance with the provisions of § 38-2021.04 within 90 days after March 6, 1952, retroactive to the effective date of this act, and no recomputation shall be made which will reduce the annuity received by any retired teacher; provided, that the average annual salary during any 5 consecutive years, specified in § 38-2021.04, upon which the annuity is based shall be within the last 10 years of allowable service in the public schools of the District of Columbia; provided further, that the increased amount of the annuity resulting therefrom shall be a straight life annuity without any insurance or death benefits of any kind.

Mar. 6, 1952, 66 Stat. 22, ch. 95, § 10
1981 Ed., § 31-1227.
1973 Ed., § 31-725a.
“The effective date of this act,” referred to twice in this section, is prescribed by § 11 of the Act of March 6, 1952, 66 Stat. 22, ch. 95.